Hawaii statutes.
§200-8
Boating program; payment of costs. The cost of
administering a comprehensive statewide boating program, including but not
limited to the cost of:

(1) Operating, maintaining, and managing all boating
facilities under the control of the department;

(2) Improving boating safety;

(3) Operating a vessel registration and boating
casualty investigation and reporting system;

(4) Other boating program activities; and

(5) Planning,
developing, managing, operating, or maintaining of all lands and improvements
under the control and management of the board, including but not limited to
permanent or temporary staff positions who may be appointed without regard to
chapter 76,

shall be paid from the boating
special fund; provided that any fees collected within small boat harbors shall
be expended only for costs related to the operation, upkeep, maintenance, and
improvement of the small boat harbors. The amortization (principal and
interest) of the costs of capital improvements for boating facilities appropriated
after July 1, 1975, including
but not limited to berths, slips, ramps, related accommodations, general
navigation channels, breakwaters, aids to navigation, and other harbor
structures, may be paid from the boating special fund or from general revenues
as the legislature may authorize in each situation. Revenues provided in this
chapter for the boating special fund shall be at least sufficient to pay the
special fund costs established in this section. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2; am L
2011, c 197, §5; am L
2015, c 96, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next